Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-239
Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations; prescribe forms.

The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of sections 57-235 to 57-239. The Tax Commissioner shall also prescribe necessary forms for the implementation of sections 57-235 to 57-239.

Laws 1981, LB 59, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 8.